Utah statutes.
53A-11-102.5.   Dual enrollment.
(1)  A person having control of a minor under this part who is enrolled in a
regularly established private school or a home school may also enroll the
minor in a public school for dual enrollment purposes.
(2)  The minor may participate in any academic activity in the public school
available to students in the minor's grade or age group, subject to compliance
with the same rules and requirements that apply to a full-time student's
participation in the activity.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Sections 53A-11-101.5 and 53A-11-102, a
student enrolled in a public school may also be enrolled in a private school
or a home school for dual enrollment purposes.
(4)  A student enrolled in a dual enrollment program is considered a student
of the district in which the public school of attendance is located for
purposes of state funding to the extent of the student's participation in the
public school programs.
(5)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the State Board of Education shall make rules for purposes of dual
enrollment to govern and regulate the transferability of credits toward
graduation that are earned in a private or home school.
(6)  The State Board of Education shall determine the policies and procedures
necessary to permit students enrolled under Subsection (1) to participate in
public school extracurricular activities.
